Arkansas statutes. Title 11 Labor and Industrial Relations
Chapter 9 Workers' Compensation
11-9-501. Limitations on compensation — Death and disability.

Compensation to the injured employee shall not be allowed for the first seven (7) days' disability resulting from injury, excluding the day of injury.

If a disability extends beyond that period, compensation shall commence with the ninth day of disability.

If a disability extends for a period of two (2) weeks, compensation shall be allowed beginning the first day of disability, excluding the day of injury.

Compensation payable to an injured employee for disability, other than permanent partial disability as specified in subsection (d) of this section, and compensation payable to surviving dependents of a deceased employee, the total disability rate shall not exceed sixty-six and two-thirds percent (662/3%) of the employee's average weekly wage with a twenty dollar ($20.00) per week minimum, subject to the following maximums:

For disability or death due to an injury occurring on and after July 1, 1987, through December 31, 1988, the maximum weekly benefits payable shall be one hundred eighty-nine dollars ($189);

For disability or death due to an injury occurring on and after January 1, 1989, through December 31, 1989, the maximum weekly benefits payable shall be sixty-six and two-thirds percent (662/3%) of the state average weekly wage;

For a disability or death which results from an injury occurring on and after January 1, 1990, the maximum weekly benefit payable shall be seventy percent (70%) of the state average weekly wage;

For a disability or death which results from an injury occurring during a calendar year beginning on or after January 1, 1996, the maximum weekly benefit payable shall be eighty-five percent (85%) of the state average weekly wage if, and only if, the Insurance Commissioner certifies to the Workers' Compensation Commission during December 1995, that the overall workers' compensation insurance rates for Arkansas have decreased by at least ten percent (10%) subsequent to July 1, 1993;

After January 1, 1994, the weekly benefit rate shall be rounded to the nearest whole dollar, i.e., if the actual rate be a dollar amount plus forty-nine cents (49¢) or less, the rate for compensation purposes shall be the next lower whole dollar amount, and, if the actual rate be a dollar amount plus fifty cents (50¢) or more, then the rate for compensation purposes shall be the next higher whole dollar amount.

Upon request of the respondent or carrier, the commission shall review the claim and determine the necessity for additional temporary total benefits after forty (40) weeks or after any thirteen-week interval thereafter and may, if warranted by the preponderance of the evidence on the basis of the record as a whole, extend the period of payment for temporary total disability.

Any weekly benefit payments made after the commission has terminated temporary total benefits shall be classified as warranted by the facts in the case and as otherwise provided for in this chapter.

The permanent partial disability rate for compensation payable to an employee for permanent partial disability which results from an injury occurring on or after July 1, 1986, shall not exceed sixty-six and two-thirds percent (662/3%) of the employee's average weekly wage, with a twenty-dollar-per-week minimum, subject to a maximum of one hundred fifty-four dollars ($154). However, if the employee's total disability rate for the injury would be two hundred five dollars and thirty-five cents ($205.35) per week or greater, then the maximum permanent partial disability rate shall be seventy-five percent (75%) of the employee's total disability rate.

The permanent partial disability rate provided herein shall also apply to scheduled permanent injuries except those resulting in amputation or permanent total loss of use of a member.

The permanent partial disability rate for amputation or permanent total loss of use of a member shall be the same as the employee's total disability rate as specified in subsection (b) of this section, subject to the maximum as set forth in subdivision (b)(4) of this section.

The provisions of this subsection shall apply only to those injuries which occur on or after January 1, 1996.

Compensation payable to the dependents of a deceased employee shall be in addition to the funeral allowance and those benefits which were paid or to which the injured employee was entitled in his or her lifetime under §§ 11-9-508 — 11-9-517 and §§ 11-9-519 — 11-9-526.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 10, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Init. Meas. 1956, No. 1, § 1, Acts 1957; Init. Meas. 1968, No. 1, § 1, Acts 1969; Acts 1973, No. 221, § 1; 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1227, § 4; 1979, No. 253, § 2; 1981, No. 290, § 2; 1986 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 10, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1310; reen. Acts 1987, No. 1015, § 4; Acts 1993, No. 796, § 15; Acts 1995, No. 129, § 1; 1995, No. 1144, §§ 1, 2.

11-9-502. Limitations on compensation — Exceptions.

The benefits shall be paid for a period not to exceed four hundred fifty (450) weeks of disability, except that this limitation shall not apply in cases of permanent total disability or death.

For injuries occurring on or after March 1, 1981, but on or before December 31, 2007, and a claim for death or permanent total disability benefits filed on or before June 30, 2019, the first seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) of weekly benefits for death or permanent total disability shall be paid by the employer or its insurance carrier in the manner provided in this chapter.

For injuries occurring on or after January 1, 2008, and a claim for death or permanent total disability benefits filed on or before June 30, 2019, the employer or its insurance carrier shall pay weekly benefits for death or permanent total disability not to exceed three hundred twenty-five (325) times the maximum total disability rate established for the date of the injury under this chapter.

An employee or a dependent of an employee who has filed a claim for death or permanent total disability benefits on or before June 30, 2019, and who receives a total of seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) in weekly benefits for injuries sustained on or before December 31, 2007, shall be eligible to continue to draw benefits at the rates prescribed in this chapter, but all benefits in excess of seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) shall be payable from the Death and Permanent Total Disability Trust Fund.

An employee or a dependent of an employee who has filed a claim for death or permanent total disability benefits on or before June 30, 2019, and who receives the maximum amount specified in subdivision (b)(1)(B) of this section shall be eligible to continue to draw benefits at the rates prescribed by this chapter payable from the trust fund.

The trust fund shall consist of such funds as may be prescribed by law and shall be administered, invested, and disbursed by the Workers' Compensation Commission.

Each employer or the insurance carrier of the employer in each case of death of an employee where there are no dependents shall pay into the trust fund the sum of five hundred dollars ($500).

A claim against the trust fund shall not be filed later than June 30, 2019, regardless of the date of injury or death, or otherwise.

The trust fund is not liable for a claim for permanent total disability or death filed after June 30, 2019.

For a claim for permanent total disability or death filed after June 30, 2019, the employer at the time of the employee's compensable injury is liable for permanent total disability or death benefits under this chapter, excluding this section and any claim pending under § 11-9-525 on June 30, 2019.

Upon satisfaction of the liabilities of the trust fund, the trust fund shall be terminated.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 10, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Init. Meas. 1956, No. 1, § 1, Acts 1957; Init. Meas. 1968, No. 1, § 1, Acts 1969; Acts 1973, No. 221, § 1; 1979, No. 253, § 2; 1981, No. 290, § 2; 1986 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 10, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1310; Acts 2007, No. 1599, § 1; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 4, §§ 5, 6; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 5, §§ 5, 6.

Amendments.

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 4 and 5 inserted “and a claim for death or permanent total disability benefits filed on or before June 30, 2019” in (b)(1)(A) and (B); inserted “has filed a claim for death or permanent total disability benefits on or before June 30, 2019, and who” in (b)(2)(A) and (B); and added (c).

11-9-503. Violation of safety provisions.

Notwithstanding any other definition of extra-hazardous employer as provided by § 11-9-409(c), any employer who fails to utilize the consultative safety services available through the Division of Labor, its own insurance carrier, or a private safety consultant shall be identified as an extra-hazardous employer if it is established by a preponderance of the evidence that an injury or death is caused in substantial part by the failure of the employer to comply with any Arkansas statute or official rule pertaining to the health or safety of employees or fails to follow safety consultant recommendations.

When so notified, the employer shall comply with § 11-9-409(c)(2)-(8).

Provided, if it is established by a preponderance of the evidence that the employee is injured as a result of the employee's violation of the employer's safety rules or instructions, the provisions of this section shall not apply.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 10, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Init. Meas. 1956, No. 1, § 1, Acts 1957; Init. Meas. 1968, No. 1, § 1, Acts 1969; Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1227, § 5; 1979, No. 253, § 2; 1981, No. 290, § 2; 1986 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 10, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1310; reen. Acts 1987, No. 1015, § 5; 1993, No. 796, § 16; 2019, No. 315, § 788; 2019, No. 910, §
5366.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

This section was reenacted by Acts 1987, No. 1015, § 5. Acts 1987, No. 834, provided that 1987 legislation reenacting acts passed in the 1976 Extended Session should not repeal any other 1987 legislation and that such other legislation would be controlling in the event of conflict.

Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 9, provided in part:

“Nothing in the act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001, nor in Act 1552 of 1999 shall impliedly repeal any part of Act 796 of 1993. Act 796 of 1993 is expressly reaffirmed by this act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001.”

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (a)(1).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Labor” for “Department of Labor” in (a)(1).

11-9-504. Additional compensation — Illegally employed minor.

Where an injury or death is sustained by a minor employed in violation of federal or state statutes pertaining to minimum ages for employment of minors, compensation or death benefits provided for by this chapter shall be doubled.

However, the penalty shall not apply when the minor misrepresents his or her age, in writing, to the employer.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 10, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Init. Meas. 1956, No. 1, § 1, Acts 1957; Init. Meas. 1968, No. 1, § 1, Acts 1969; Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1227, § 6; 1979, No. 253, § 2; 1981, No. 290, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1310; reen. Acts 1987, No. 1015, § 6.

11-9-505. Additional compensation — Rehabilitation.

Any employer who without reasonable cause refuses to return an employee who is injured in the course of employment to work, where suitable employment is available within the employee's physical and mental limitations, upon order of the Workers' Compensation Commission, and in addition to other benefits, shall be liable to pay to the employee the difference between benefits received and the average weekly wages lost during the period of the refusal, for a period not exceeding one (1) year.

In determining the availability of employment, the continuance in business of the employer shall be considered, and any written rules promulgated by the employer with respect to seniority or the provisions of any collective bargaining agreement with respect to seniority shall control.

In addition to benefits otherwise provided for by this chapter, an employee who is entitled to receive compensation benefits for permanent disability and who has not been offered an opportunity to return to work or reemployment assistance shall be paid reasonable expenses of travel and maintenance and other necessary costs of a program of vocational rehabilitation if the commission finds that the program is reasonable in relation to the disability sustained by the employee.

The employer's responsibility for additional payments shall not exceed seventy-two (72) weeks, regardless of the length of the program requested.

The employee shall not be required to enter any program of vocational rehabilitation against his or her consent; however, no employee who waives rehabilitation or refuses to participate in or cooperate for reasonable cause with either an offered program of rehabilitation or job placement assistance shall be entitled to permanent partial disability benefits in excess of the percentage of permanent physical impairment established by objective physical findings.

A request for the program, if elected by the claimant, must be filed with the commission prior to a determination of the amount of permanent disability benefits payable to the employee.

This section shall not be construed as creating an exception to the common law regarding employment at will.

The purpose and intent of this section is to place an emphasis on returning the injured worker to work, while still allowing and providing for vocational rehabilitation programs when determined appropriate by the commission.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 10, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Init. Meas. 1956, No. 1, § 1, Acts 1957; Init. Meas. 1968, No. 1, § 1, Acts 1969; Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1227, § 7; 1979, No. 253, § 2; 1981, No. 290, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1310; reen. Acts 1987, No. 1015, § 7; Acts 1993, No. 796, § 17.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 9, provided in part:

“Nothing in the act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001, nor in Act 1552 of 1999 shall impliedly repeal any part of Act 796 of 1993. Act 796 of 1993 is expressly reaffirmed by this act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001.”

11-9-506. Limitations on compensation — Recipients of unemployment benefits.

Any other provisions of this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, no compensation in any amount for temporary total, temporary partial, or permanent total disability shall be payable to an injured employee with respect to any week for which the injured employee receives unemployment insurance benefits under the Division of Workforce Services Law, § 11-10-101 et seq., or the unemployment insurance law of any other state.

Provided, however, if a claim for temporary total disability is controverted and later determined to be compensable, temporary total disability shall be payable to an injured employee with respect to any week for which the injured employee receives unemployment benefits but only to the extent that the temporary total disability otherwise payable exceeds the unemployment benefits.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 10, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Init. Meas. 1956, No. 1, § 1, Acts 1957; Init. Meas. 1968, No. 1, § 1, Acts 1969; Acts 1981, No. 290, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1310; Acts 1993, No. 796, § 18; 2019, No. 910, § 171.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 9, provided in part:

“Nothing in the act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001, nor in Act 1552 of 1999 shall impliedly repeal any part of Act 796 of 1993. Act 796 of 1993 is expressly reaffirmed by this act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001.”

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Workforce Services Law” for “Department of Workforce Services Law” in (a).

Partial Disability Benefits.

This section by its language is limited to temporary total disability and permanent total disability, and the receipt of temporary or permanent partial disability benefits is not precluded. Levi Strauss & Co. v. Laymance, 38 Ark. App. 55, 828 S.W.2d 356 (1992).

11-9-507. Special project to improve safety.

For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 1987, the Workers' Compensation Commission shall allocate one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to a special project for the following purposes:

Identification of industries or jobs having a high incidence of injuries;

Determination of the causes of injuries of which there is a high incidence; and

The provision of educational or advisory services to employers and employees designed to reduce the incidence of such injuries.

It is the intent of this section to provide information and other services to employers and employees that will improve workplace safety in the State of Arkansas.

For succeeding fiscal years, the commission shall determine to what extent the project should be funded.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 10, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Init. Meas. 1956, No. 1, § 1, Acts 1957; Init. Meas. 1968, No. 1, § 1, Acts 1969; Acts 1981, No. 290, § 2; Acts 1986 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 10, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1310.

11-9-508. Medical services and supplies — Liability of employer — Definition.

The employer shall promptly provide for an injured employee such medical, surgical, hospital, chiropractic, optometric, podiatric, and nursing services and medicine, crutches, ambulatory devices, artificial limbs, eyeglasses, contact lenses, hearing aids, and other apparatus as may be reasonably necessary in connection with the injury received by the employee.

Rabies is a highly contagious and potentially deadly infectious disease, and exposure to rabies and the risk of infection is the direct result of an injury caused by the bite of a rabies-infected animal under this section.

An employer shall promptly provide reasonably necessary medical treatment to an injured employee who is exposed to rabies as described in subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section.

As used in subdivision (a)(2)(B)(i) of this section, “reasonably necessary medical treatment” means without limitation any diagnostic and preventive measures prescribed for detection, diagnosis, and prevention of rabies.

If the employer fails to provide the medical services set out in subsection (a) of this section within a reasonable time after knowledge of the injury, the Workers' Compensation Commission may direct that the injured employee obtain the medical service at the expense of the employer, and any emergency treatment afforded the injured employee shall be at the expense of the employer. In no circumstance may an employee, his or her family, or dependents, be billed or charged for any portion of the cost of providing the benefits to which he or she is entitled under this chapter.

In order to help control the cost of medical benefits, the commission, on or before July 1, 1994, following a public hearing and with the assistance and cooperation of the State Insurance Department, is authorized and directed to establish appropriate rules to establish and implement a system of managed health care for the State of Arkansas.

For the purpose of establishing and implementing a system of managed health care, the commission is authorized to:

Develop rules for the certification of managed care entities to provide managed care to injured workers;

Develop rules for peer review, service utilization, and resolution of medical disputes;

Prohibit “balance billing” from the employee, employer, or carrier;

Establish fees for medical services as provided in Workers' Compensation Commission Rule 30 and its amendments.

The commission shall make no distinction in approving fees from different classes of medical service providers or healthcare providers for provision of the same or essentially similar medical services or healthcare services as specified in this section; and

Give the employer the right to choose the initial treating physician, with the injured employee having the right to petition the commission for a one-time-only change of physician to one who is associated with a managed care entity certified by the commission or is the regular treating physician of the employee who maintains the employee's medical records and with whom the employee has a bona fide doctor-patient relationship demonstrated by a history of regular treatment prior to the onset of the compensable injury, but only if the primary care physician agrees to refer the employee to a certified managed care entity for any specialized treatment, including physical therapy, and only if such primary care physician agrees to comply with all the rules, terms, and conditions regarding services performed by the managed care entity initially chosen by the employer.

A petition for change of physician shall be expedited by the commission.

Any section or subsection of this chapter notwithstanding, the injured employee shall have direct access to any optometric or ophthalmologic medical service provider who agrees to provide services under the rules, terms, and conditions regarding services performed by the managed care entity initially chosen by the employer for the treatment and management of eye injuries or conditions. Such optometric or ophthalmologic medical service provider shall be considered a certified provider by the commission.

The commission is authorized to promulgate any other rules as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this section and its purpose of controlling medical costs through the establishment of a managed care system.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 11, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Acts 1975, No. 330, § 1; 1979, No. 253, § 3; 1981, No. 290, § 3; 1983, No. 444, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1311; Acts 1993, No. 796, § 19; 2003, No. 1473, § 23; 2009, No. 653, § 1; 2017, No. 658, § 1; 2019, No. 315, §§ 789-791.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 9, provided in part:

“Nothing in the act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001, nor in Act 1552 of 1999 shall impliedly repeal any part of Act 796 of 1993. Act 796 of 1993 is expressly reaffirmed by this act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001.”

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment redesignated former (a) as (a)(1) and added (a)(2).

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (c) and
(d)(1); substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (d)(2); and deleted “or regulations” following “rules” in (f).

11-9-509. Medical services and supplies — Amounts and time
periods.

The amounts payable or time periods allowable for authorized medical, hospital, and other services and treatment furnished under §§ 11-9-508 — 11-9-516, unless waived by the employer-respondent or approved by the Workers' Compensation Commission and warranted by the preponderance of the evidence on the basis of the record as a whole, are:

Six (6) months if the claimant lost no compensable time from work as a result of his or her injury;

Six (6) months following the return to work by an injured employee who has been receiving authorized medical or hospital or other services or treatment;

Ten thousand dollars ($10,000) aggregate for all authorized medical, hospital, and other services and treatment, including any amounts paid under subdivisions (1) and (2) of this section.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 11, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Acts 1981, No. 290, § 3; 1983, No. 444, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1311.

11-9-510. Medical services and supplies — Contest of liability.

The employer shall not be liable for any of the payments provided for in §§ 11-9-508 — 11-9-516 in the case of a contest of liability where the Workers' Compensation Commission shall decide that the injury does not come within the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 11, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Acts 1975, No. 330, § 1; 1979, No. 253, § 3; Acts 1981, No. 290, § 3; 1983, No. 444, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1311.

11-9-511. Medical services and supplies — Physical examination.

An injured employee claiming to be entitled to compensation shall submit to such physical examination and treatment by another qualified physician, designated or approved by the Workers' Compensation Commission, as the commission may require from time to time if reasonable and necessary.

The places of examination and treatment shall be reasonably convenient for the employee.

Such physician as the employee, employer, or insurance carrier may select and pay for may participate in the examination if the employee, employer, or insurance carrier so requests.

In cases where the commission directs examination or treatment, proceedings shall be suspended, and no compensation shall be payable for any period during which the employee refuses to submit to examination and treatment or otherwise obstructs the examination or treatment.

Failure of the employee to obey the order of the commission in respect to examination or treatment for a period of one (1) year from the date of suspension of compensation shall bar the right of the claimant to further compensation in respect to the injury.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 11, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Acts 1975, No. 330, § 1; 1979, No. 253, § 3; 1981, No. 290, § 3; 1983, No. 444, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1311.

11-9-512. Medical services and supplies — Refusal to submit to operation.

Except in cases of hernia, which are specifically covered by § 11-9-523, where an injured person unreasonably refuses to submit to a surgical operation which has been advised by at least two (2) qualified physicians and where the recommended operation does not involve unreasonable risk of life or additional serious physical impairment, the Workers' Compensation Commission, in fixing the amount of compensation, may take into consideration such refusal to submit to the advised operation.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 11, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Acts 1975, No. 330, § 1; 1979, No. 253, § 3; 1981, No. 290, § 3; 1983, No. 444, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1311.

11-9-513. Medical services and supplies — Approval of charges.

All persons who render services or provide things mentioned in §§ 11-9-508 — 11-9-516 shall submit the reasonableness of the charges to the Workers' Compensation Commission for its approval, and, when so approved, the charges shall be enforceable by the commission in the same manner as is provided for the enforcement of compensation payments.

However, the provisions of this section relating to charges shall not apply where a written contract exists between the employer and the person who renders the service or furnishes the things.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 11, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Acts 1975, No. 330, § 1; 1979, No. 253, § 3; 1981, No. 290, § 3; 1983, No. 444, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1311.

11-9-514. Medical services and supplies — Change of physician.

If the employee selects a physician, the Workers' Compensation Commission shall not authorize a change of physician unless the employee first establishes to the satisfaction of the commission that there is a compelling reason or circumstance justifying a change.

If the employer selects a physician, the claimant may petition the commission one (1) time only for a change of physician, and if the commission approves the change with or without a hearing, the commission shall determine the second physician and shall not be bound by recommendations of claimant or respondent.

However, if the change desired by the claimant is to a chiropractic physician, optometrist, or podiatrist, the claimant may make the change by giving advance written notification to the employer or carrier.

Following establishment of an Arkansas managed care system as provided in § 11-9-508, subdivisions (a)(1) and (2) of this section shall become null and void, and thereafter:

The employer shall have the right to select the initial primary care physician from among those associated with managed care entities certified by the commission as provided in § 11-9-508.

Where the employer has contracted with a managed care organization certified by the commission, the claimant employee, however, shall be allowed to change physicians by petitioning the commission one (1) time only for a change of physician to a physician who must either be associated with the managed care entity chosen by the employer or be the regular treating physician of the employee who maintains the employee's medical records and with whom the employee has a bona fide doctor-patient relationship demonstrated by a history of regular treatment prior to the onset of the compensable injury but only if the primary care physician agrees to refer the employee to the managed care entity chosen by the employer for any specialized treatment, including physical therapy, and only if the primary care physician agrees to comply with all the rules, terms, and conditions regarding services performed by the managed care entity chosen by the employer.

Where the employer does not have a contract with a managed care organization certified by the commission, the claimant employee, however, shall be allowed to change physicians by petitioning the commission one (1) time only for a change of physician, to a physician who must either be associated with any managed care entity certified by the commission or be the regular treating physician of the employee who maintains the employee's medical records and with whom the employee has a bona fide doctor-patient relationship demonstrated by a history of regular treatment prior to the onset of the compensable injury, but only if the primary care physician agrees to refer the employee to a physician associated with any managed care entity certified by the commission for any specialized treatment, including physical therapy, and only if the primary care physician agrees to comply with all the rules, terms, and conditions regarding services performed by any managed care entity certified by the commission.

A petition for change of physician shall be expedited by the commission.

Treatment or services furnished or prescribed by any physician other than the ones selected according to the foregoing, except emergency treatment, shall be at the claimant's expense.

After being notified of an injury, the employer or insurance carrier shall deliver to the employee, in person or by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested, a copy of a notice, approved or prescribed by the commission, which explains the employee's rights and responsibilities concerning change of physician.

If, after notice of injury, the employee is not furnished a copy of the notice, the change of physician rules do not apply.

Any unauthorized medical expense incurred after the employee has received a copy of the notice shall not be the responsibility of the employer.

A request for a hearing on a change of physician by either the employer or the injured employee shall be given preference on the commission's docket over all other matters.

Cooperation on the part of both the injured employee and the employer in an effort to select another physician is encouraged.

When compensability is controverted, subsection (b) of this section shall not apply if:

The employee requests medical assistance in writing prior to seeking the same as a result of an alleged compensable injury;

The employer refuses to refer the employee to a medical provider within forty-eight (48) hours after a written request as provided above;

The alleged injury is later found to be a compensable injury; and

The employer has not made a previous offer of medical treatment.

The commission shall by rule require the inclusion of the information set forth in subsection (f) of this section on all AR-P forms.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 11, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Acts 1975, No. 330, § 1; 1979, No. 253, § 3; 1981, No. 290, § 3; 1983, No. 444, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1311; Acts 1993, No. 796, § 20; 1999, No. 1167, § 1;
2019, No. 315, § 792.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 9, provided in part:

“Nothing in the act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001, nor in Act 1552 of 1999 shall impliedly repeal any part of Act 796 of 1993. Act 796 of 1993 is expressly reaffirmed by this act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001.”

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (g).

11-9-515. Medical services and supplies — Spiritual treatment.

When an employer and employee so agree in writing, nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent an employee whose injury or disability has been established in accordance with the provisions of this chapter from relying in good faith on treatment by prayer or spiritual means alone, in accordance with the tenets and practice of a recognized church or religious denomination by a duly accredited practitioner thereof, and having nursing services appropriate therewith, without suffering loss or diminution of the compensation benefits under this chapter.

However, the employee shall submit to all physical examinations required by this chapter.

The cost of the treatment and nursing care shall be paid by the employee unless the employer agrees to make the payment.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 11, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Acts 1975, No. 330, § 1; 1979, No. 253, § 3; 1981, No. 290, § 3; 1983, No. 444, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1311.

11-9-516. Medical services and supplies — Information furnished by provider.

Every hospital or other person furnishing the injured employee with medical services shall permit its records to be copied by and shall furnish full written information to the Workers' Compensation Commission, the Workers' Compensation Fraud Investigation Unit, the employer, the carrier, and the employee or the employee's dependents.

The reasonable cost of copies as set forth in Workers' Compensation Commission Rule 30 shall be paid by the one requesting them to the healthcare or medical service provider furnishing them.

No person who in good faith pursuant to subsection (a) of this section or pursuant to rules established by the commission reports medical information shall incur legal liability for the disclosure of the information.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 11, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Acts 1979, No. 253, § 3; 1981, No. 290, § 3; 1983, No. 444, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1311; Acts 1993, No. 796, § 21; 2019, No. 315, § 793.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 9, provided in part:

“Nothing in the act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001, nor in Act 1552 of 1999 shall impliedly repeal any part of Act 796 of 1993. Act 796 of 1993 is expressly reaffirmed by this act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001.”

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (b).

11-9-517. Medical services and supplies — Rules.

The Workers' Compensation Commission is authorized to establish rules, including schedules of maximum allowable fees for specified medical services rendered with respect to compensable injuries, for the purpose of controlling the cost of medical and hospital services and supplies provided pursuant to §§ 11-9-508 — 11-9-516.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 11, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Acts 1986 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 10, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1311; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 794.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “Rules” in the section heading and in the text.

11-9-518. Weekly wages as basis for compensation.

Compensation shall be computed on the average weekly wage earned by the employee under the contract of hire in force at the time of the accident and in no case shall be computed on less than a full-time workweek in the employment.

Where the injured employee was working on a piece basis, the average weekly wage shall be determined by dividing the earnings of the employee by the number of hours required to earn the wages during the period not to exceed fifty-two (52) weeks preceding the week in which the accident occurred and by multiplying this hourly wage by the number of hours in a full-time workweek in the employment.

Overtime earnings are to be added to the regular weekly wages and shall be computed by dividing the overtime earnings by the number of weeks worked by the employee in the same employment under the contract of hire in force at the time of the accident, not to exceed a period of fifty-two (52) weeks preceding the accident.

If, because of exceptional circumstances, the average weekly wage cannot be fairly and justly determined by the above formulas, the commission may determine the average weekly wage by a method that is just and fair to all parties concerned.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 12, Acts 1949, p. 1420; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1312.